Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the  Bureau of Labor and Industries, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $15,080,204.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,933,348 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Bureau of Labor
and Industries.
SECTION 3. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$3,148,480 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of administrative expenses by  the Bureau of Labor and Industries from the Wage
Security Fund.
(2) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, expenditures by the Bureau of Labor and
Industries for wage claim payments from the Wage Security Fund are not limited.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,354,891 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Bureau of Labor and
Industries.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5516 (SB 5516-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5516 (SB 5516-A) Page 2